Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 6. SALE OR TRANSFER OF GOODS

CHAPTER 203. EXPORTING ARTICLES WITHOUT INSPECTION

Sec. 203.001. CRIMINAL PENALTY FOR EXPORTING ARTICLES WITHOUT REQUIRED INSPECTION. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) exports from this state, or ships for the purpose of exportation to a state other than this state or to a foreign port, an article of commerce that by law of this state is required to be inspected by a public inspector; and

(2) does not have the article inspected as required by law.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $100.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.